Washington statutes.
RCW 42.45.020

Authority to perform notarial act.

(1) A notarial officer may perform a notarial act authorized by this chapter or by law of this state other than this chapter.

(2)(a) A notarial officer may not perform a notarial act with respect to a record to which the officer or the officer's spouse or domestic partner is a party, or in which any of the above have a direct beneficial interest.

(b) A notarial officer may not notarize the notarial officer's own signature.

(c) A notarial act performed in violation of this subsection (2) is voidable.

(3) A notarial officer may certify that a tangible copy of an electronic record is an accurate copy of the electronic record.

[ 2019 c 154 s 2; 2017 c 281 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 154: See note following RCW 42.45.280.